Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-136
City council; investigations; attendance and examination of witnesses; power to compel; oaths.

The council, or any committee of the members thereof, shall have power to compel the attendance of witnesses for the investigation of matters that may come before them, and the presiding officer of the council, or the chairman of such committee for the time being, may administer the requisite oaths, and such council or committee shall have the same authority to compel the giving of testimony as is conferred on courts of justice.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. I, § 35, p. 418;

C.S.1922, § 3523;

C.S.1929, § 14-136;

R.S.1943, § 14-136.